Hawaii statutes.
§451A-11 Notice to director.
(a) Any person who holds a license shall notify the director in writing of the
person's current mailing and residence address. It shall be the licensee's
duty to provide written notice of any change of address within thirty days of
the change.

(b) Any notice required to be given by the
director to the person shall be mailed to the last known address. Failure to
provide the written notice of change of address shall absolve the director from
any duty to provide notice of any matter required by law to be provided to the
licensee. [L 1969, c 205, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 88, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next